Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) A ballot proposition to lengthen the terms of office of port commissioners from four years to six years must be submitted to the voters of any port district upon either resolution of the port commissioners or petition of voters of the port district proposing the increase in terms of office, which petition has been signed by voters of the port district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the number of voters in the port district voting at the last general election.(2) The petition must be submitted to the county auditor. If the petition was signed by sufficient valid signatures, the ballot proposition must be submitted at the next general election that occurs 60 or more days after the adoption of the resolution or submission of the petition.(3) If the ballot proposition lengthening the terms of office of port commissioners is approved by a simple majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition, the commissioner elected at that election is elected to a six-year term of office. The terms of office of the other commissioners are not lengthened.(4) If two commissioners are elected in that election or the next subsequent general election, the commissioner thus elected receiving the highest number of votes is elected to a six-year term of office and the other commissioner is elected to a four-year term of office. Each successor commissioner is elected to six-year terms.(5) This section does not apply to a port district that is required to maintain four-year terms under RCW 53.12.172 or to a port district that has five port commissioners.--- END ---